District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.17

Rules.

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, including the establishment of:

(1)

Fees;

(2)

Procedures for license application, issuance, and renewal;

(3)

Procedures for regulation of nurse staffing agencies located outside the District of Columbia;

(4)

Requirements for maintenance of documentation and for submission of documentation to the Department;

(5)

Minimum standards for operation and continued licensure of nurse staffing agencies; and

(6)

Enforcement and hearing procedures.

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 17, 50 DCR 10914
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 15-74, the “Nursing Staffing Agency Act of 2003”, see Mayor’s Order 2004-83, May 21, 2004 ( 51 DCR 5837).